Nebraska statutes.
Sec. 2.Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201281-2,147
Law, how cited.

Sections 81-2,147 to 81-2,147.12 shall be known
and cited as the Nebraska Seed Law.

Laws 1969, c. 759, § 1, p. 2860;

Laws 1985, LB 460, § 11;

Laws 2009, LB263, § 2.